Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-250 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Education, in collaboration with the


Office of Educational Quality and Accountability and the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education, shall establish the Oklahoma


Principal Leadership Development Program to increase the


effectiveness of school principals. The program shall provide a


principal leadership framework to reflect best practices and a

Req. No. 2258 Page 1


statewide infrastructure that provides consistent access to


sustained, high-quality professional development and mentoring for


school principals.


B. The State Department of Education shall implement the


Oklahoma Principal Leadership Development Program in the following


three phases:


1. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the Department shall


publish a professional development plan for principals that provides


learning guidelines and goals. The plan shall include at least one


goal related to student academic growth or achievement, or both, and


at least one goal for school climate. The plan shall include five


(5) days of high-quality professional development targeted on


building skills for school leadership. The plan for elementary


school principals shall include professional development in early


literacy and numeracy. The Department may identify and publish a


list of professional development providers or programs that meet the


requirements of this paragraph;


2. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, each new principal


shall work with a principal mentor for two (2) consecutive years.


For the purposes of this section, a new principal is an individual


who has completed the certification requirements for a school


principal pursuant to Section 6-189 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes and is serving in his or her first or second year as a


principal of a public school in this state. A principal mentor is

Req. No. 2258 Page 2


an individual who has completed the certification requirements for a


school principal and has been employed as a public school principal


for at least five (5) years. A principal mentor shall complete a


training program developed or selected by the Department; and


3. Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the State Department


of Education, in collaboration with the Office of Educational


Quality and Accountability and the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education, shall use information gained from implementation of


paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection to develop a year-long


principal leadership academy. The Department may establish an


implementation timeline for the academy with the goal of providing


an opportunity to all certified principals in this state to complete


the academy.


C. Subject to the availability of funding, beginning with the


2029-2030 school year, the State Department of Education shall


provide a stipend of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to new


principals, as defined in paragraph 2 of subsection B of this


section, who:


1. Complete five (5) days of high-quality professional


development required by paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section;


2. Complete the two-year mentorship required by paragraph 2 of


subsection B of this section; and


3. Are employed by a public school district in this state.



Req. No. 2258 Page 3


D. Upon implementation of the year-long principal leadership


academy as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection B of this


section and subject to the availability of funding, the State


Department of Education shall provide a stipend of Five Thousand


Dollars ($5,000.00) to certified principals who:


1. Complete the principal leadership academy as provided for in


paragraph 3 of subsection B of this section; and


2. Are employed by a public school district in this state.


E. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2258 EB 1/14/2026 11:43:35 AM















Req. No. 2258 Page 4